North Carolina, session 2025, HB126.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 106-740 reads as rewritten:
"§ 106-740. Public hearings on condemnation and rezoning of farmland.
An ordinance adopted under this Part or Part 3 of this Article may shall provide that no State
or local public agency or governmental unit may formally initiate any action to condemn any
interest in qualifying farmland farmland, or rezone such land, within a voluntary agricultural
district under this Part or an enhanced voluntary agricultural district under Part 3 of this Article
until such agency has requested the local agricultural advisory board established under
G.S. 106-739 to hold a public hearing on the proposed condemnation.condemnation or rezoning
that conforms to the following requirements:
(1) Following a public hearing held pursuant to this section, the board shall
prepare and submit written findings and a recommendation to the
decision-making body of the agency proposing acquisition.
(2) The board designated to hold the hearing shall have 30 45 days after receiving
a request under this section to hold the public hearing and submit its findings
and recommendations to the agency.
(3) The agency may shall not formally initiate a condemnation or rezoning action
while the proposed condemnation is properly before the advisory board within
these time limitations.until 120 days after the date the local agricultural
advisory board submits its findings and recommendations to the agency."
*H126-v-3*

SECTION 2. This act is effective October 1, 2025, and applies to condemnation or
rezoning actions initiated by any State or local public agency or governmental unit on or after
that date.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 12th day of June, 2025.
s/ Rachel Hunt
President of the Senate
s/ Donna McDowell White
Presiding Officer of the House of Representatives
_____________________________________
Josh Stein
Governor
Approved __________.m. this ______________ day of ___________________, 2025
Page 2 House Bill 126-Ratified